Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1815YH (4) 91 dg/ko H.F. 412 Section 1. Section 237A.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 16. âUnhousedâ means lacking a fixed, 3 regular, and adequate nighttime residence. âUnhousedâ includes 4 but is not limited to all of the following: 5 a. A person living in the housing of other persons due to 6 the personâs loss of housing, economic hardship, or similar 7 reason. 8 b. A person living in a motel, hotel, or campground due to 9 the lack of a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence. 10 c. A person living in an emergency or transitional shelter. 11 d. A person abandoned in a hospital. 12 e. A person living in a place not designed for, or 13 ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human 14 beings. 15 f. A person living in a car, park, public space, abandoned 16 building, substandard housing, bus or train station, or similar 17 setting. 18 Sec. 2. Section 237A.13, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 19 2025, is amended to read as follows: 20 b. The childâs parent, guardian, or custodian is 21 seeking employment. Eligibility for assistance while 22 seeking employment shall be limited to thirty days during a 23 twelve-month period. The department shall extend the time 24 limit under this paragraph if the child is under six years 25 of age and the childâs parent, guardian, or custodian who is 26 seeking employment is unhoused. 27 Sec. 3. Section 237A.13, subsection 8, Code 2025, is amended 28 by adding the following new paragraph: 29 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. An unhoused child. 30 Sec. 4. Section 237A.13, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 31 following new subsection: 32 NEW SUBSECTION . 9A. The department shall implement an 33 expedited process to approve an unhoused person for child care 34 assistance under this section, and to grant an extension under 35 -1- LSB 1815YH (4) 91 dg/ko 1/ 2 H.F. 412 subsection 1, paragraph âbâ . 1